en: Mung beans, Mung dal, Moong dal
ar: بقلة الماش
bg: Боб мунг
bn: মুগ
bo: སྲན་ལྗང་།
ca: mongeta mung
cs: mung fazole
cy: ffeuen fwng
da: mung-bønne
de: Mungbohnen, Mungobohnen
dv: ނޫމުގު
el: ροβίτσα
eo: mungfabo
es: Judías mungo, Soja verde
et: munguba
fa: ماش‎
fi: mungpapu
fr: Haricots mungo, Soja vert
gu: મગ
he: מש
hi: मूँग
hr: zlatni grahovi, zlatni grah
hu: mungóbab
id: kacang hijau
it: fagioli mung, fagiolo mung
ja: リョクトウ
jv: kacang ijo
kn: ಹೆಸರು ಕಾಳು
ko: 녹두
ky: маш
la: Vigna radiata
ml: ചെറുപയർ
mn: ногоон шош
mr: मूग
ms: pokok kacang hijau
my: ပဲတီစိမ်း
nb: mungbønne
ne: मुगी
nl: Mungbonen
or: ମୁଗ
pa: ਮੂੰਗੀ
pl: Fasolka mung, fasola mung, fasola złota
ps: مۍ
ru: маш
sa: मुद्ग
si: මුංඇට
su: kacang héjo
sv: mungböna
sw: mchoroko
ta: பயறு
te: పెసలు
tg: мош
th: ถั่วเขียว
tl: monggo
uk: боби мунг
uz: mosh
vi: đậu xanh
za: duhheu
zh: 綠豆

en: Cooked Mung beans
fr: Haricots mungo cuits

en: Dry mung beans, Dry mature mung beans
fr: Haricots mungo secs
hr: Suhi mung grah
pl: Sucha fasola mung

en: Sprouted mung beans, Mung bean sprouts
es: Germinados de judía mungo
fr: Haricots mungos germés, Pousses de haricot mungo, jeunes pousses de haricot mungo, Pousses de soja vert, Pousse de ambérique vert
hr: Proklijale mungo grah
ja: 緑豆スプラウト, 緑豆もやし, もやし
pl: Kiełki fasoli mung

en: Tonka beans, tonka
ca: Favas tonco
de: Tonkabohnen
fr: Fèves de Tonka
hr: Tonka grah
it: Faves di Tonka
la: Dipteryx odorata
nl: Tonkabonen
pt: Favas de cumaru

en: Mixed beans, Bean mix
da: Blandede bønner
sv: Blandade bönor

en: Broad beans
da: Hestebønner
fr: Fèves
sv: Bondbönor

en: Dried broad beans
da: Tørrede hestebønner
fr: Fèves séchées
sv: Torkade bondbönor

en: Fresh broad beans, Fresh fava beans, Fresh faba beans
da: Friske hestebønner
es: Habas, Habitas
fr: Fèves frais, Féverolles frais
hr: Svježe mahune
la: Vicia faba
nl: Tuinbonen
sv: Färska bondbönor

en: Fresh broad beans to shell
fr: Fèves fraîches à écosser

en: Canned broad beans, Canned fava beans, Canned faba beans
da: Hestebønner på dåse
es: Habas en conserva, Habitas en conserva
fr: Fèves en conserve, Féverolles en conserve
hr: Konzervirani bob
it: Fave in scatola
nl: Tuinbonen in blik/pot
pl: Strączki w puszkach, strączkowe w puszkach, strączki konserwowe

en: Cooked broad beans
da: Kogte hestebønner
fr: Fèves cuites

en: Peas
bg: грах
da: Ærter
de: Erbsen
es: Guisantes, Chícharos, Arvejas
fi: herneet
fr: Pois, Pois cultivé
hr: Grašak
it: Piselli
ja: エンドウ
la: Pisum sativum
nl: Erwten
pl: Groszek, Groch
ru: Горох посевной

en: Pigeon peas, Gandule beans
es: Gandules, Guandules, Guandús
fr: Pois d'Angole
hr: Golublji grašak
ja: キマメ
la: Cajanus cajan, Cajanus indicus
nl: Duivenerwten

en: Rice beans, Ricebeans
fr: Haricots riz
hr: Rižin grah
ja: タケアズキ
la: Vigna umbellata

en: Scarlet runner beans, Runner beans, Multiflora beans
es: Judiones, Ayocote, Ayecote, Judiones de la Granja
fr: Haricots d'Espagne, Haricots écarlates
hr: Grimizni grah
ja: ベニバナインゲン
la: Phaseolus coccineus
nl: Pronkbonen

en: Runner beans from Styria
de: Steirische Käferbohne
hr: Trkaći grah iz Štajerske
nl: Pronkbonen uit Stiermarken

en: Sword beans
es: Habas espada
fr: Pois sabre, Haricots sabre
hr: Mač grah
ja: ナタマメ, 刀豆
la: Canavalia gladiata

en: Tepary beans
es: Frijoles tépari, Frijol tépari
fr: Haricots tépari
hr: Teparski grah
ja: テパリービーン
la: Phaseolus acutifolius

en: Velvet beans
es: Granos de terciopelo
fr: Pois mascate
hr: Baršunasti grah
ja: ハッショウマメ, 八升豆, ムクナ, ビロード豆
la: Mucuna pruriens
nl: Fluweelbonen